Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,222
Forcible entry and detainer; complaint; contents.

The summons shall not issue until the plaintiff shall have filed his complaint in writing which shall particularly describe the premises so entered upon or detained, and shall set forth either an unlawful and forcible entry and detention, or an unlawful and forcible detention after a peaceable or lawful entry of the described premises. The complaint shall be copied into and made a part of the record.

Laws 1929, c. 82, § 121, p. 310;

C.S.1929, § 22-1205;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,122;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 72;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-572.